Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2069.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of water resources; water infrastructure The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of water resources for the following purposes: 1. $18,000,000 to the Apache Junction water district for water and sewer capacity expansion. 2. $10,000,000 to the city of Apache Junction for the Weekes wash regional multi-use detention facility for stormwater retention. 3. $12,500,000 to the Apache Junction water district for water resilience and conservation projects.